Utah statutes.
58-49-2.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Dietitian Board  created in Section 58-49-3.
(2)  "Certified dietitian" means a person who is certified by the division as
meeting the certification requirements provided in this chapter.
(3)  "Commission on Dietetic Registration" means the credentialing component
of the American Dietetic Association.
(4)  "Dietetics" means the integration and application of principles derived
from the sciences of food for the development, management, and provision of
dietary services for individuals and groups for meeting their health care
needs.  "Dietetics" includes:
(a)  the evaluation of a person's dietary status;
(b)  the advising and education of persons on dietary needs; and
(c)  the evaluation of needs, implementation of systems to support needs, and
maintenance of appropriate standards of quality in food and dietary service
for individuals, groups, or patients in licensed institutional facilities or
in private office settings.
(5)  "Unprofessional conduct" as defined in Section 58-1-501 and as may be
further defined by rule includes failing to maintain a level of professional
practice consistent with all initial and subsequent requirements by which
certification is achieved or maintained under this chapter.
